South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4652.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 5, Chapter 3, Title 63 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 63-3-605.  (A) The judge presiding over any family court hearing must issue an order no later than: (1) ten business days after conclusion of the hearing; or (2) seven business days after submission of post-hearing evidence, whichever occurs later. (B) Any extension beyond the timeframes established in subsection (A) is permissible only if: (1) every ten days, the judge provides the parties a written explanation of the reasons for the extension; and (2) an extension is limited to extraordinary circumstances that make compliance with the timeframes provided in subsection (A) impracticable. (C) This section applies to all matters taken under advisement by the court. (D) Failure to comply with this section may be addressed through judicial review or disciplinary action as provided by law. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----